Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1383XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1383XD (4) 91
th/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 321E.29B, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Notwithstanding section 321E.8, the department may issue
annual permits for the operation of vehicles or combinations
of vehicles transporting fluid milk products to or from a milk
plant, receiving station, or transfer station, exceeding the
weight limitation of section 321.463 but not exceeding a gross
weight of ninety-six one hundred thirty thousand pounds, on
primary roads and primary road extensions in cities.
Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies on and after
the effective date of this Act to fluid milk products annual
permits issued on or after that date and to such permits issued
prior to that date that are in effect on that date.